Missouri, session 2026, SB1611.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.2559, to read as
follows:
173.2559. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Urban and Local Food Systems
Apprenticeship Act".
2. As used in this section, unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following terms mean:
(1) "Apiary apprenticeship program", a registered
apprenticeship program, approved by the United States
Department of Labor or the Missouri office of workforce
development within the department, that provides on-the-job
learning and related technical instruction necessary to
become a skilled beekeeper, apiarist, or commercial honey
producer;
(2) "Department", the department of higher education
and workforce development;
(3) "Eligible apprenticeship", an apiary
apprenticeship program or an urban farming apprenticeship
program;

SB 1611 2
(4) "Registered apprenticeship program", a program
that meets the federal guidelines set forth in 29 CFR Part
29 and 29 U.S.C. Section 50;
(5) "Urban farming apprenticeship program", a
registered apprenticeship program, approved by the United
States Department of Labor or the Missouri office of
workforce development within the department, that provides
on-the-job learning and related technical instruction
necessary to become a skilled urban farmer, market gardener,
or local food systems manager, with training in skills such
as regenerative soil practices, intensive crop production,
and post-harvest handling.
3. The department, in consultation with the department
of agriculture, shall promote the development and
registration of eligible apprenticeships by:
(1) Establishing model standards and curriculum
guidelines for both urban farming apprenticeship programs
and apiary apprenticeship programs to accelerate their
approval;
(2) Providing technical assistance and outreach to
nonprofit organizations, educational institutions, local
government agencies, and small agricultural businesses
seeking to become program sponsors for eligible
apprenticeships;
(3) Working with the coordinating board for higher
education to ensure that related technical instruction for
eligible apprenticeships is available through community
colleges and other approved training providers in urban and
peri-urban areas.
4. The department shall allocate a portion of state
funds designated for apprenticeship expansion to registered

SB 1611 3
apprenticeship programs that offer eligible apprenticeships.
Priority for such funds shall be given to:
(1) New or expanding programs located within a
metropolitan statistical area of the state;
(2) Programs that partner with local food banks,
veteran organizations, or entities dedicated to increasing
local food access in underserved communities; and
(3) Programs that are led by or specifically serve
minority and historically underserved farming populations.
5. The department shall annually report to the general
assembly on the progress of the Missouri urban and local
food systems apprenticeship act, including the number of
registered eligible apprenticeships, the number of
apprentices enrolled, and the number of credentials issued.
✓